Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-5101
Investment of public endowment funds; manner.

Pursuant to Article XI, section 1, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the Legislature authorizes the investment of public endowment funds by any city having a population of more than five thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census in the manner required of a prudent investor who shall act with care, skill, and diligence under the prevailing circumstance and in such investments as the governing body of such city, acting in a fiduciary capacity for the exclusive purpose of protecting and benefiting such investment, may determine.

Laws 2009, LB402, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 33.